Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.16.060

Effect of exclusion as to liability for indebtedness.

The exclusion of an area from the boundaries of the code city shall not exempt any real property therein from taxation for the purpose of paying any indebtedness of the code city existing at the time of its exclusion and the interest thereon.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.16.060.]